Massachusetts, session 194th, H1376.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 6D of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding 
the following clause:- 
(g) The total assessed amount for acute hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, non-
hospital provider organizations, pharmaceutical manufacturing companies, pharmacy benefit 
managers and surcharge payors shall not increase from the previous year at a rate greater than the 
health care cost growth benchmark approved by the commission pursuant to Section 9 of this 
chapter for the same year. 
SECTION 2. Section 7 of chapter 12C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding 
the following clause:- 
(g) The total assessed amount for acute hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, non-
hospital provider organizations, pharmaceutical manufacturing companies, pharmacy benefit 
managers and surcharge payors shall not increase from the previous year at a rate greater than the 

of 2 13 health care cost growth benchmark approved by the health policy commission pursuant to 
Section 9 of chapter 6D for the same year.